Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.904

Effective date—2003 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 790).

Except for section 11 of this act, the remainder of this act takes effect July 1, 2003.

[ 2003 c 2 s 13 (Initiative Measure No. 790, approved November 5, 2002).]